Utah statutes.
78B-6-310.   Contempt -- Action by court.

The court shall determine whether the person proceeded against is guilty of the contempt charged.  If the court finds the person is guilty of the contempt, the court may impose a fine not exceeding $1,000, order the person incarcerated in the county jail not exceeding 30 days, or both.  However, a justice court judge or court commissioner may punish for contempt by a fine not to exceed $500 or by incarceration for five days or both.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

